Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.120

Violations or unsound practices—Temporary cease and desist order—Director's authority.

Whenever the director determines that the acts specified in RCW 31.45.110 or their continuation is likely to cause insolvency or substantial injury to the public, the director may also issue a temporary cease and desist order requiring the licensee to cease and desist from the violation or practice. The order becomes effective upon service upon the licensee and remains effective unless set aside, limited, or suspended by a court under RCW 31.45.130 pending the completion of the administrative proceedings under the notice and until such time as the director dismisses the charges specified in the notice or until the effective date of the cease and desist order issued against the licensee under RCW 31.45.110.

[ 2003 c 86 s 18; 1994 c 92 s 285; 1991 c 355 s 12.]